pt-PT: Aspeto de ladrilho: 3D; Cimento; Vidro; Mármore; Metal; Pedra; Madeira; Outro
zh-CN: 瓷砖外观: 3D; 水泥; 玻璃; 大理石; 金属; 石头; 木头; 其他
ro-RO: Aspect plăci: 3D; Ciment; Sticlă; Marmură; Metal; Piatră; Lemn; Altele
zh-TW: 瓷磚外觀: 3D; 水泥; 玻璃; 大理石; 金屬; 石頭; 木材; 其他
da: Fliselook: 3D; Cement; Glas; Marmor; Metal; Sten; Træ; Andet
ko: 타일 모양: 3D; 시멘트; 유리; 대리석; 금속; 석재; 목재; 기타
th: ลักษณะกระเบื้อง: 3D; ซีเมนต์; แก้ว; หินอ่อน; โลหะ; หิน; ไม้; อื่นๆ
hu: Csempe megjelenése: 3D; Cement; Üveg; Márvány; Fém; Kő; Fa; Egyéb
de: Aussehen der Fliese: 3D; Zement; Glas; Marmor; Metall; Stein; Holz; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Izgled pločica: 3D; Cement; Staklo; Mramor; Metal; Kamen; Drvo; Ostalo
bg-BG: Изглед на плочки: 3D; Цимент; Стъкло; Мрамор; Метал; Камък; Дърво; Други
tr: Fayans görünümü: 3B; Çimento; Cam; Mermer; Metal; Taş; Ahşap; Diğer
es: Aspecto del azulejo: 3D; Cemento; Vidrio; Mármol; Metal; Piedra; Madera; Otros
en: Tile look: 3D; Cement; Glass; Marble; Metal; Stone; Wood; Other
fi: Laatan ulkonäkö: 3D; Sementti; Lasi; Marmori; Metalli; Kivi; Puu; Muu
sl-SI: Videz ploščice: 3D; Cement; Steklo; Marmor; Kovina; Kamen; Les; Drugo
it: Aspetto delle piastrelle: 3D; Cemento; Vetro; Marmo; Metallo; Pietra; Legno; Altro
cs: Vzhled dlaždic: 3D; Cement; Sklo; Mramor; Kov; Kámen; Dřevo; Jiné
sv: Kakelutseende: 3D; Cement; Glas; Marmor; Metall; Sten; Trä; Övrigt
vi: Kiểu gạch lát: 3D; Xi măng; Thủy tinh; Cẩm thạch; Kim loại; Đá; Gỗ; Khác
nl: Tegellook: 3D; Cement; Glas; Marmer; Metaal; Steen; Hout; Andere
pl: Wygląd płytek: 3D; Cement; Szkło; Marmur; Metal; Kamień; Drewno; Inne
el: Όψη πλακιδίων: 3D; Τσιμέντο; Γυαλί; Μάρμαρο; Μέταλλο; Πέτρα; Ξύλο; Άλλο
ja: タイルの見た目: 3D; セメント; ガラス; 大理石; 金属; 石; 木材; その他
lt-LT: Plytelių išvaizda: 3D; Cementas; Stiklas; Marmuras; Metalas; Akmuo; Mediena; Kita
nb: Flisutseende: 3D; Sement; Glass; Marmor; Metall; Stein; Trevirke; Annet
fr: Aspect du carrelage: 3D; Ciment; Verre; Marbre; Métal; Pierre; Bois; Autre
ru: Вид плитки: 3D; Цемент; Стеклянные; Мрамор; Металл; Камень; Дерево; Другой
sk-SK: Vzhľad dlaždice: 3D; Cement; Sklo; Mramor; Kov; Kameň; Drevo; Iné
pt-BR: Aparência do ladrilho: 3D; Cimento; Vidro; Mármore; Metal; Pedra; Madeira; Outro